Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 3. Personnel Rules.

Sec. 39.25.140.
Amendment of personnel rules.

The director of personnel shall prepare and submit to the commissioner of administration any proposed amendments to the personnel rules for all positions and employees subject to this chapter.

The commissioner of administration shall review the amendments and submit them to the personnel board.

At least 30 days before the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a personnel rule, the secretary to the personnel board shall provide notice that the personnel board has the proposed action under consideration. The notice shall be

posted in public buildings throughout the state;

published in one or more newspapers of general circulation throughout the state;

mailed to each person or group that filed a request for notice of proposed action with the secretary to the personnel board;

furnished to each member of the legislature and to the Legislative Affairs Agency.

The rules may provide for exemptions and modifications that are necessary to assure the continuity of federal grants to agencies supported in whole or in part by federal contributions.

The rules adopted under this chapter relate to the internal management of state agencies and their adoption is not subject to AS 44.62 (the Administrative Procedure Act). The rules shall be published in the Alaska Administrative Register and Code for informational purposes.

Failure to mail notice to a person as required in this section does not invalidate an action taken by the personnel board.

An amendment to the personnel rules takes effect 30 days after it is approved by the personnel board. The board, if requested to do so, may hold a public hearing on a proposed amendment.

History.

(§ 12 ch 144 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 5 SLA 1966; am §§ 11—13 ch 112 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

For Administrative Procedure Act, see AS 44.62.

Administrative Code. —

For classification, see 2 AAC 7, art. 1.

For recruitment and examination, see 2 AAC 7, art. 2.

For appointments, see 2 AAC 7, art. 5.

For probationary periods, see 2 AAC 7, art. 6.

For personnel evaluation and training, see 2 AAC 7, art. 7.

For pay, see 2 AAC 7, art. 8.

For separation and demotion, see 2 AAC 7, art. 9.

For disputes: hearings and appeals, see 2 AAC 7, art. 10.

Sec. 39.25.150.
Scope of the rules.

The personnel rules must provide for

the preparation, maintenance, and revision, by the director of personnel, subject to approval of the commissioner of administration and the personnel board, of a position classification plan for all positions in the classified and partially exempt services; the position classification plan must include

a grouping together of all positions into classes on the basis of duties and responsibilities;

an appropriate title, a description of the duties and responsibilities, training and experience qualifications, and other necessary specifications for each class of positions;

the preparation, maintenance, revision, and administration by the director of personnel of a pay plan for all positions in the classified and partially exempt services; the pay plan (A) shall be based upon the position classification plan; (B) must provide for fair and reasonable compensation for services rendered, and reflect the principle of like pay for like work; (C) may be amended, approved, or disapproved by the legislature in regular or special session; after the pay plan is in effect, a salary or wage payment may not be made to a state employee covered by the plan unless the payment is in accordance with this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter or unless the payment is in accordance with a valid agreement entered into in accordance with AS 23.40;

the use of employee selection methods, including open competitive assessment devices, when appropriate, that will fairly evaluate the capacity and fitness of the person assessed to discharge the duties of the position in which employment is sought;

the formulation of a list for appointment and promotion to a position;

the procedure for filling positions; the rule adopted under this paragraph may include procedures providing a preference for local residents when appropriate;

promotions from within the state service when there are qualified candidates in the state service; vacancies shall be filled by promotion whenever practicable and in the best interest of the state service, and promotion shall be by competitive assessment whenever possible; in considering promotions, the applicants’ qualifications, performance records, seniority, and conduct shall be evaluated;

a period of probation not to exceed one year before an appointment to a position becomes permanent, unless the period of probation is extended as set out in a collective bargaining agreement under AS 23.40; however, a permanent employee receiving a promotional appointment retains permanent status in the service and job class from which appointed for the duration of the probationary period and may be demoted to a former class without right of appeal, notwithstanding AS

39.25.170

, but, if the employee is dismissed from the service, the appeal rights under AS

39.25.170

apply;

nonpermanent and emergency appointments to positions in the state service in accordance with AS

39.25.195

—

39.25.200

;

provisional appointment without competitive assessment when the recruitment and assessment procedures have not identified qualified candidates in sufficient number;

transfers from one department to another and from another merit system jurisdiction to the state service;

transfers from one area of the state to another;

the reinstatement of a person who resigns in good standing;

layoffs for reason of lack of money or work, abolition of positions, or material changes in duties or organization; both performance and seniority records shall be considered in the development of layoff orders;

the development, maintenance, and use of employee performance records;

the establishment of disciplinary measures, which may include disciplinary suspension without pay;

the procedures for review of disputed personnel actions, for resolving employee and interagency grievances, and for resolving grievances of the general public concerning the operation of the state personnel system;

hours of work for all employees in the state service;

methods and procedures covering overtime work and pay;

the granting of employment preference rights, not within the area of promotion, to a veteran, former prisoner of war, or member of the national guard under AS

39.25.159

;

the employment of persons in permanent positions on a part-time basis of 15 hours or more a week, including the employment of two persons to fill one permanent full-time position; these employees shall be designated as permanent part-time employees;

the granting of employment preference to individuals with severe disabilities; this includes the right to provisional appointment without competitive assessment for periods of up to four months and the granting of eligibility to an individual with a severe disability provisionally appointed under the rules who demonstrates ability to perform the job for permanent appointment without competitive assessment; provisional employment under this paragraph may not exceed four months during a 12-month period; “individual with a severe disability,” as used in this paragraph, means an individual certified by the director of the division of vocational rehabilitation to be severely disabled;

the establishment of programs facilitating the employment of disadvantaged persons;

the delegation, when feasible, of personnel responsibilities and duties to the principal departments of the executive branch;

the establishment of a transition period of up to 12 months for an employee to be reappointed to a classified position if the employee’s position is withdrawn from the partially exempt or exempt service and placed in the classified service;

a procedure allowing an applicant who is a veteran, former prisoner of war, or member of the national guard under AS

39.25.159

to substitute military work experience or training for a nonmilitary work experience or training requirement of a position if the military experience or training meets or exceeds the position requirement;

other rules and administrative regulations, not inconsistent with this chapter, that are necessary for its enforcement.

History.

(§ 13 ch 144 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 130 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 147 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 117 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 1967; am § 3 ch 226 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 42 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 67 SLA 1979; am § 38 ch 94 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 2 ch 89 SLA 1982; am § 14 ch 112 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 127 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 111 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 118 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 21 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 2020)

Cross references. —

For the pay plan prepared under (2) of this section, see AS

39.27.011

.

For legislative direction that, notwithstanding paragraph (2) of this section, the Department of Administration develop a distinct position classification plan and a distinct pay plan for oil and gas auditors and their immediate supervisors who work under direction of the oil and gas revenue audit master positions authorized by AS

39.25.110

(42), see § 70, ch. 1, SSSLA 2007.

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraph (25) was enacted as (26), renumber in 2020.

Administrative Code. —

For classification, see 2 AAC 7, art. 1.

For recruitment and examination, see 2 AAC 7, art. 2.

For appointments, see 2 AAC 7, art. 5.

For probationary periods, see 2 AAC 7, art. 6.

For personnel evaluation and training, see 2 AAC 7, art. 7.

For pay, see 2 AAC 7, art. 8.

For separation and demotion, see 2 AAC 7, art. 9.

For disputes: hearings and appeals, see 2 AAC 7, art. 10.

For leave, see 2 AAC 7, art. 11.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective July 19, 2020, added paragraph (26) [now (25)].

Sec. 39.25.153.
Departmental personnel officers.

If a principal department of the executive branch has a personnel officer, the personnel officer shall be employed by and located within that department.

[Repealed, § 16 ch 111 SLA 2000.]

[Repealed, § 16 ch 111 SLA 2000.]

[Repealed, § 16 ch 111 SLA 2000.]

History.

(§ 14 ch 207 SLA 1975; am § 15 ch 112 SLA 1982; am § 16 ch 111 SLA 2000)

Sec. 39.25.155.
Vocational substitution program.

It is the purpose of this section to establish a liberal system under which Alaskan residents not employed by the state who do not meet the minimum educational or experience criteria for state employment may demonstrate their abilities and achieve temporary or permanent state employee status. This program is intended for use primarily in remote or underemployed areas where the opportunity to gain required hiring qualifications does not exist, but where there is a local need for employees with certain vocational skills. The provisions of this section apply notwithstanding the provisions of AS

39.25.150

(3).

The director of personnel shall establish vocational standards as alternatives for educational or experience levels now required for nonprofessional occupational areas under the state personnel system and incorporate these alternatives into the state classification plan.

Applicants shall be placed on lists for the vocational classification indicated in their applications based on an assessment of their vocational ability and place of residence.

The director of personnel shall establish rates of pay for the selected vocational substitution classifications in relation to the beginning entry classification pay rates. However, vocational substitution personnel may not be classified lower than one pay range below the range to which the classified position is allocated.

The director of personnel shall embody a concept combined of vocational ability, place of residence, local hire, and area unemployment in the personnel rules to accomplish the intent of this section.

Applicants selected under this section are subject to the provisions of AS

39.25.160

.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 67 SLA 1983.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 14 SLA 1971; am § 19 ch 67 SLA 1983; am §§ 5, 6 ch 111 SLA 2000)

Sec. 39.25.157.
Position descriptions.

The division of personnel, in consultation with the appropriate department or agency, shall require the preparation of and shall maintain a position description for each position in the classified service. The position description shall describe the essential functions of the position and the actual skills and abilities required to perform the tasks assigned to the position. A general requirement for physical abilities may not be imposed on a job classification unless each position within the class requires the use of the physical ability.

History.

(§ 2 ch 86 SLA 1988)

Sec. 39.25.158.
Reemployment rights for injured state employees.

An injured employee is eligible for reemployment rights under this section if the employee requests to return to work for the state within 30 days after receipt of a release from a physician indicating that the employee is able to return to full or modified work.

After an employee requests to return to work, the reemployment benefits administrator of the division of workers’ compensation or the director of vocational rehabilitation in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall review the request and certify that the employee is able to return to work under (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section, or defer certification until the employee completes retraining under (f) of this section.

If the reemployment benefits administrator or the director of vocational rehabilitation certifies that the employee is able to perform the tasks assigned to the employee’s former position, the agency shall reemploy the employee within 30 days after receipt of the certification unless the position no longer exists. If a permanent, probationary, or provisional employee is currently employed in the position, the agency shall cause a vacancy under the layoff provisions of AS

39.25.150

(13).

If the employee is not eligible for reemployment under (c) of this section but is able to perform the essential functions of the position, then the agency shall reemploy the employee in the position after making a reasonable accommodation to the physical and mental limitations of the employee unless the position no longer exists. Reasonable accommodation may include imposing work restrictions on the tasks performed by the employee, making job or site modifications necessary to permit the employee to perform the tasks of the position, removing institutional and architectural barriers, and providing additional support services.

If the employee is not eligible for reemployment under (c) or (d) of this section and if the agency has a vacant position for which the employee is qualified that is comparable in wage to the position the employee previously held, then the agency shall offer the employee the position. If the employee is unable to perform the essential functions of a comparable position within the agency, then the employee is entitled to reemployment in a comparable position for which the employee is qualified with another agency if the position is vacant and the employee is able to perform the essential functions of that position.

If the agency and other agencies in the state are unable to reemploy the employee in a position at a wage comparable to the employee’s previous wage, the employee may request reemployment at a lower wage or accept retraining under AS

23.30.041

. After completing the training the employee may request reemployment in a position for which the employee has been retrained in the agency. If the agency cannot offer reemployment, the employee may request reemployment in a position for which the employee has been retrained with another agency.

An agency may refuse to reemploy or continue the employment of a former employee if reasonable accommodation imposes an undue hardship on the operation of the agency’s program or if, after reasonable efforts at accommodation, the injured employee cannot perform the essential functions of the position in a manner that would not endanger the health or safety of

the employee because the job imposes an imminent and substantial degree of risk to the employee; or

others to a greater extent than if a nonhandicapped person performed the job.

Factors an agency may consider in determining undue hardship under (g) of this section include the current number of employees in the section or office, number and type of facilities, size of budget, nature and cost of the accommodation needed, and the type, composition, and structure of the work force.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if an injured employee requests reemployment under (e) or (f) of this section and if the employee is able to perform the essential functions of the position, the state may not hire another person for that position except an employee in layoff status for that job class.

A collective bargaining agreement under AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

may not include terms contrary to this section.

In this section,

“agency” includes a department, division, office, agency, board, commission, authority, or other organizational unit of the executive branch of state government;

“comparable wage” means a wage equivalent to at least the state minimum wage under AS

23.10.065

or 75 percent of the worker’s gross hourly wage at the time of injury, whichever is greater;

“injured employee” or “employee” means a permanent, probationary, or provisional employee of an agency in the classified service whose injury is a compensable injury or condition under AS 23.30.

History.

(§ 2 ch 86 SLA 1988; am § 44 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For appointments, see 2 AAC 7, art. 5.

Appeal moot. —

Employee's appeal of an administrative decision denying the employee a rehire preference was properly dismissed as moot because (1) the employee was granted the preference, (2) the employee did not timely appeal the denial of the employee's claims for back pay and retraining costs within 30 days, and (3) a strict enforcement of appellate rules would not result in surprise or unfair prejudice, since the employee, as a pro se litigant, ignored the trial court's advice about how to appeal.
O'Donnoghue v. State, — P.3d — (Alaska Aug. 1, 2018) (memorandum decision).

Sec. 39.25.159.
Employment preference for veterans and former prisoners of war.

A veteran or former prisoner of war who possesses the necessary qualifications for a position or job classification applied for under this chapter is entitled to an employment preference as follows:

in an assessment using numerical ratings, points equal to five percent of the points available from the assessment device or devices shall be added to the passing score of a veteran, and points equal to 10 percent of the points available from the assessment device or devices shall be added to the passing score of a disabled veteran or former prisoner of war;

in an assessment not using numerical ratings, consideration shall be afforded to a veteran; additionally, an opportunity to interview for the position shall be afforded to a disabled veteran or a former prisoner of war.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 56 SLA 1993.]

A member of the national guard who possesses the necessary qualifications for a position or job classification applied for under this chapter is entitled to an employment preference as follows:

in an assessment using numerical ratings, points equal to five percent of the points available from the assessment device or devices shall be added to the passing score of a member of the national guard;

in an assessment not using numerical ratings, consideration shall be afforded to a member of the national guard.

A person may receive an employment preference under only one of the categories described in (a) or (c) of this section. A person may use the preference without limitation when being considered for a position for which persons who are not currently state employees are being considered. If the recruitment for a position is limited to state employees, preference under (a) or (c) of this section may not be counted. If a position in the classified service is eliminated, employees shall be released in accordance with rules adopted under AS

39.25.150

(13). In the case of a comparison of employees with equal qualifications on the factors adopted under AS

39.25.150

(13), a veteran, former prisoner of war, or member of the national guard shall be given preference over a person who is not a veteran, former prisoner of war, or member of the national guard, and the veteran, former prisoner of war, or member of the national guard shall be kept on the job.

Subsections (a), (c), and (d) of this section may not be interpreted to amend the terms of a collective bargaining agreement.

In this section,

“consideration” means reviewing a person’s entire application in order to determine whether the person should be selected, rejected, or admitted to further steps in the assessment or selection process;

“disabled veteran” means a veteran who is entitled to compensation under laws administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, a person who was honorably discharged or released from active duty because of a service-connected disability, or a person who was disabled in the line of duty while serving in the Alaska Territorial Guard;

“member of the national guard” means a person who

is presently serving as a member in good standing in the national guard; or

was released from service in the national guard under honorable conditions;

“prisoner of war” means a person who has been a prisoner of war during a declared war or other conflict as determined by the Department of Defense under federal regulations;

“veteran” means a person

with 181 days or more active service in the armed forces of the United States who has been honorably discharged after having served during any period

between April 6, 1917, and December 1, 1919, between September 16, 1940, and December 31, 1947, between June 27, 1950, and October 14, 1976, between August 2, 1990, and January 2, 1992, beginning September 11, 2001, and ending on the day prescribed by Presidential proclamation or by law as the last date of Operation Iraqi Freedom, or during any time period listed in 5 U.S.C. 2108(1); or

in which the person was awarded a campaign badge, expedition medal, the Purple Heart, or an award or decoration for heroism or gallantry in action;

who served 181 days or more in the Alaska Territorial Guard.

History.

(§ 2 ch 42 SLA 1990; am § 18 ch 93 SLA 1991; am §§ 1, 2 ch 56 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 7 SLA 1999; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 111 SLA 2000; am §§ 6 — 9 ch 21 SLA 2009; am § 7 ch 102 SLA 2014; am § 3 ch 71 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 39.25.150(b)—(d). Renumbered in 1990.

Subsection (c) was enacted as (d).
Relettered in 1999, at which time former (c) was relettered as (d) and the reference to “(c)” in subsection (a) was substituted for “(d)” in conformity with these changes.
Subsections (d) and (e) were enacted as (e) and (f), respectively.
Relettered in 2009, at which time former (d) was relettered as (f).

Paragraph (f)(1) was enacted as (d)(4); renumbered as (d)(1) in 2000, at which time former (d)(1) — (3) were renumbered as (d)(2) — (4).
Paragraph (f)(3) was enacted as (d)(5); renumbered in 2009, at which time former (d)(3) and (4) were renumbered as (f)(4) and (5).

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 102, SLA 2014, amending paragraph (f)(5), see 2014 Senate Journal 1469 — 1470.

Administrative Code. —

For recruitment and examination, see 2 AAC 7, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 29, 2014, in (f)(5)(A)(i), inserted the language beginning “, between August 2, 1990” to the end of the subsubparagraph.

The 2018 amendment, effective October 27, 2018, rewrote (f)(3), which read “(3) ‘member of the national guard’ means a person who is presently serving as a member of the Alaska National Guard and who has at least eight years of service in the Alaska National Guard.”